Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Vehicle Rental Taxes.

Sec. 43.52.010.
Levy of passenger vehicle rental tax.

There is imposed an excise tax on the charge for the lease or rental of a passenger vehicle in this state if the lease or rental of the passenger vehicle does not exceed a period of 90 consecutive days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.52.020.
Rate of passenger vehicle rental tax.

The rate of the tax levied in AS

43.52.010

is 10 percent of the total fees and costs charged for the lease or rental of the passenger vehicle.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.52.030.
Levy of recreational vehicle rental tax.

There is imposed an excise tax on the charge for the lease or rental of a recreational vehicle in this state if the lease or rental of the recreational vehicle does not exceed a period of 90 consecutive days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For vehicle rental tax, see 15 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 43.52.040.
Rate of recreational vehicle rental tax.

The rate of the tax levied in AS

43.52.030

is three percent of the total fees and costs charged for the lease or rental of the recreational vehicle.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For vehicle rental tax, see 15 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 43.52.050.
Liability for payment of vehicle rental taxes.

The taxes imposed by AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

shall be collected and paid to the department

by the person who provides the leased or rented vehicle; and

in the manner and at the times required by the department by regulation.

The tax shall be stated as a separate item on the lease or rental contract or other document invoicing payment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the addition of AS

43.52.200

—

43.52.295

by 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2.

Administrative Code. —

For vehicle rental tax, see 15 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 43.52.060.
Applicability of the tax.

The provisions of AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

apply to a passenger or recreational vehicle whether or not the vehicle is registered and licensed in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the addition of AS

43.52.200

-

43.52.295

by 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2.

Sec. 43.52.070.
Relationship to municipal levies.

The taxes imposed by AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

are in addition to taxes that may be imposed on vehicle rentals by a municipality under AS 29.45.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the addition of AS

43.52.200

—

43.52.295

by 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2.

Sec. 43.52.080.
Administration of tax and sharing of information with municipalities.

The department shall administer the taxes imposed by this chapter and may adopt necessary regulations.

The proceeds of the vehicle rental taxes imposed by AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

shall be deposited into a special vehicle rental tax account in the general fund.

The legislature may appropriate the actual balance of the vehicle rental tax account for tourism development and marketing. This section is not intended to create a dedicated fund.

Notwithstanding AS

40.25.100(a)

and AS

43.05.230(a)

, the department may furnish the proper officer or representative of a municipality the tax returns or reports filed with the department under AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

if the municipality grants substantially similar privileges to the department, provides adequate safeguards for the confidentiality of the returns and reports, and uses the returns and reports only for tax purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the addition of AS

43.52.200

—

43.52.295

by 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2.

Administrative Code. —

For vehicle rental tax, see 15 AAC 52, art. 1.

Sec. 43.52.090.
Exemption.

The tax imposed in AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

does not apply to leases or rentals for official use to federal, state, or local government agencies or employees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the addition of AS

43.52.200

—

43.52.295

by 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2.

Sec. 43.52.099.
Definitions.

In AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

,

“fees and costs” means all charges incurred by the renter before the tax imposed under AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

except

fees from the sale of automobile liability insurance, loss damage waiver insurance, and personal accident insurance;

parking tickets;

sales or excise taxes;

payment for damages to the vehicle during the rental period;

concession fees paid to an airport;

customer facility charges set by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

; and

customer facility maintenance charges set by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities under AS

02.15.090

;

“passenger vehicle” means a motor vehicle as defined in AS

28.90.990

that is driven or moved on a highway or other public right-of-way in the state, but does not include

a commercial motor vehicle as that term is defined in AS

28.90.990

;

emergency or fire equipment that is necessary to the preservation of life or property;

a farm vehicle that is controlled and operated by a farmer, used to transport agricultural products, farm machinery, or farm supplies to or from that farmer’s farm, not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier, and used within 150 miles of the farmer’s farm;

a recreational vehicle;

a taxicab;

a rental truck; in this subparagraph, “rental truck” means a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than 8,500 pounds that is designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of personal property;

a vehicle provided by an automobile dealer to a customer as replacement transportation during warranty, recall, or service contract repairs if the dealer does not receive compensation from the customer; or

a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle as those terms are defined in AS 28.90.990;

“recreational vehicle” means

a motor vehicle or trailer for recreational dwelling purposes;

a motor home or other vehicle with a motor home body style;

a one-piece camper vehicle; and

any other self-propelled vehicle with living quarters;

“tax” means the excise tax levied under AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

on the charge made for the rental of a passenger or recreational vehicle;

“vehicle” means a device in, upon, or by which a person or property may be transported or drawn upon or immediately over a highway or vehicular way or area; “vehicle” does not include

devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks;

mobile homes; or

watercraft.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 5 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (2) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

In 2006, “AS

43.52.010

—

43.52.099

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the addition of AS

43.52.200

—

43.52.295

by 2006 Primary Ballot Measure No. 2.